Washington statutes.
RCW 44.80.040

Duties of director.

(1) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, in consultation with the senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, shall employ a director of the office. The director serves at the pleasure of the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, who shall fix the director's salary.

(2)(a) The director serves as the executive and administrative head of the office.

(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the director shall employ and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The director may enter into contracts for: (i) The sale, exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii) the distribution of legislative information.

[ 2012 c 113 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.